Georgia statutes. TITLE 32 Highways, Bridges, and Ferries
Article 1 Federal Funds

32-5-1.
Receipt of federal-aid funds by state; department authorized to waive chapter provisions inconsistent with or contrary to federal laws, rules, or regulations.

The state treasurer is designated a proper authority to receive any of the federal-aid funds apportioned by the federal government under 23 U.S.C. and to receive any other federal funds apportioned to the State of Georgia for public road and other public transportation purposes, unless designated otherwise by the federal government and except as such funds may be directed by the federal government to the State Road and Tollway Authority.

If any provisions of this chapter are inconsistent with or contrary to any laws, rules, regulations, or other requirements of the United States Department of Transportation or other federal agencies, the Georgia Department of Transportation is authorized and empowered to waive such provisions of this chapter in order to resolve any such inconsistency or conflict, it being the purpose of this chapter to enable the department to comply with any requirement of the federal government in order to procure all possible federal aid and assistance for the construction or maintenance of the public roads of Georgia and other public transportation purposes.

History.

Code 1933, § 95A-701, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 32; Ga. L. 1991, p. 94, § 32; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1402, § 18; Ga. L. 1999, p. 112, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 1251, § 1-4; Ga. L. 2010, p. 863, § 3/SB 296.

Law reviews.

For note on 1999 amendment to this Code section, see 16 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 233 (1999).

For article, “Standards for Smart Growth: Searching for Limits on Agency Discretion and the Georgia Regional Transportation Authority,” see 36 Georgia L. Rev. 247 (2001).

32-5-2.
Appropriation of funds to department.

All federal funds received by the state treasurer under Code Section 32-5-1 are continually appropriated to the department for the purpose specified in the grants of such funds except as such funds may be directed by the federal government to the State Road and Tollway Authority.

History.

Code 1933, § 95A-702, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1402, § 18; Ga. L. 2001, p. 1251, § 1-5; Ga. L. 2010, p. 863, § 3/SB 296; Ga. L. 2015, p. 1072, § 2/SB 169.